Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB790.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 278.704 is amended to read as follows:
(1) No person shall commence to construct a merchant electric generating facility until
that person has applied for and obtained a construction certificate for the facility
from the board. The construction certificate shall be valid for a period of three (3)
years after the issuance date of the last permit required to be obtained from the
Energy and Environment Cabinet after which the certificate shall be void. The
certificate shall be conditioned upon the applicant obtaining necessary air, water,
and waste permits. If an applicant has not obtained all necessary permits and has
not commenced to construct prior to the expiration date of the certificate, the
applicant shall be required to obtain a new valid certificate from the board.
(2) Except as provided in subsections (3), (4), and (5) of this section, no construction
certificate shall be issued to construct a merchant electric generating facility unless
the exhaust stack of the proposed facility and any wind turbine is at least one
thousand (1,000) feet from the property boundary of any adjoining property owner
and all proposed structures or facilities used for generation of electricity are two
thousand (2,000) feet from any residential neighborhood, school, hospital, or
nursing home facility. For purposes of applications for site compatibility certificates
pursuant to KRS 278.216, only the exhaust stack of the proposed facility to be
actually used for coal or gas-fired generation or, beginning with applications for site
compatibility certificates filed on or after January 1, 2015, the proposed structure or
facility to be actually used for solar or wind generation shall be required to be at
least one thousand (1,000) feet from the property boundary of any adjoining
property owner and two thousand (2,000) feet from any residential neighborhood,
school, hospital, or nursing home facility.
(3) If the merchant electric generating facility is proposed to be located in a county or a
Page 1 of 10
XXXX 2/18/2025 2:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1399
municipality with planning and zoning, then decommissioning and setback
requirements from a property boundary, residential neighborhood, school, hospital,
or nursing home facility may be established by the planning and zoning
commission. Any decommissioning requirement or setback established by a
planning and zoning commission for a facility in an area over which it has
jurisdiction shall:
(a) Have primacy over the decommissioning requirements in KRS 278.706(2)(m)
and the setback requirement in subsections (2) and (5) of this section; and
(b) Not be subject to modification or waiver by the board through a request for
deviation by the applicant, as provided in subsection (4) of this section or
otherwise.
(4) (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, the board may grant
a deviation from the requirements of subsection (2) of this section on a
finding that the proposed facility is designed to and, as located, would meet
the goals of KRS 224.10-280, 278.010, 278.212, 278.214, 278.216, 278.218,
and 278.700 to 278.716 at a distance closer than those provided in subsection
(2) of this section.
(b) For an application made for the siting of a solar merchant electric
generating facility after January 1, 2026, the board shall not grant a
deviation that would allow for the siting of a proposed structure or facility to
be used for solar generation closer than three hundred fifty (350) feet from
the property boundary of any adjoining property owner to whom the solar
setback requirements of subsection (2) of this section would apply unless a
closer distance is consented to in writing by the adjoining property owner
and approved by the legislative body of the local government where the
adjoining property is located.
(5) If the merchant electric generating facility is proposed to be located on a site of a
Page 2 of 10
XXXX 2/18/2025 2:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1399
former coal processing plant in the Commonwealth where the electric generating
facility will utilize on-site waste coal as a fuel source, then the one thousand (1,000)
foot property boundary requirement in subsection (2) of this section shall not be
applicable; however, the applicant shall be required to meet any other setback
requirements contained in subsection (2) of this section.
(6) If requested, a merchant electric generating entity considering construction of a
facility for the generation of electricity or a person acting on behalf of such an
entity shall hold a public meeting in any county where acquisition of real estate or
any interest in real estate is being considered for the facility. A request for such a
meeting may be made by the commission, or by any city or county governmental
entity, including a board of commissioners, planning and zoning, fiscal court,
mayor, or county judge/executive. The meeting shall be held not more than thirty
(30) days from the date of the request.
(7) The purpose of the meeting under subsection (6) of this section is to fully inform
landowners and other interested parties of the full extent of the project being
considered, including the project time line. One (1) or more representatives of the
entity with full knowledge of all aspects of the project shall be present and shall
answer questions from the public.
(8) Notice of the time, subject, and location of the meeting under subsection (6) of this
section shall be posted in both a local newspaper, if any, and a newspaper of
general circulation in the county. Notice shall also be placed on the websites of the
unregulated entity, and any local governmental unit. Owners of real estate known to
be included in the project and any person whose property adjoins at any point any
property to be included in the project shall be notified personally by mail. All
notices must be mailed or posted at least two (2) weeks prior to the meeting.
(9) The merchant electric generating entity or a person acting on behalf of a merchant
electric generating entity shall, on or before the date of the public meeting held
Page 3 of 10
XXXX 2/18/2025 2:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1399
under subsection (6) of this section, provide notice of all research, testing, or any
other activities being planned or considered to:
(a) The Energy and Environment Cabinet;
(b) The Public Service Commission;
(c) The Transportation Cabinet;
(d) The Attorney General; and
(e) The Office of the Governor.
(10) Subsections (6) to (9) of this section shall not apply to any facility or project that
has already received a certificate of construction from the board.
(11) For the purposes of applying the minimum setback distances for solar merchant
electric generating facilities required under subsections (2) and (4) of this
section:
(a) The following components of a solar merchant electric generating facility
shall be located no closer than the required minimum setback distance from
the property boundary of an adjoining property owner:
1. Solar panels;
2. Substations;
3. Central inverters; and
4. Energy storage systems;
(b) Any planting or revegetation that is required by the board or by a local
government entity shall not be used in the minimum setback distance
calculation and may be located closer than the required minimum setback
distances from the property boundary of an adjoining property owner; and
(c) The minimum setback requirements shall not apply to any property owners
who are parties to an agreement to provide a location to site the solar
merchant electric generating facility or to property boundaries that are
within the solar merchant electric generating facility's proposed
Page 4 of 10
XXXX 2/18/2025 2:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1399
development site.
Section 2. KRS 278.710 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Within one hundred twenty (120) days of receipt of an administratively complete
application, or within one hundred eighty (180) days of receipt of an
administratively complete application if a hearing is requested, the board shall, by
majority vote, grant or deny a construction certificate, either in whole or in part,
based upon the following criteria:
(a) Impact of the facility on scenic surroundings, property values, the pattern and
type of development of adjacent property, and surrounding roads;
(b) Anticipated noise levels expected as a result of construction and operation of
the proposed facility;
(c) The economic impact of the facility upon the affected region and the state;
(d) Whether the facility is proposed for a site upon which existing generating
facilities, capable of generating ten megawatts (10MW) or more of electricity,
are currently located;
(e) Whether the proposed facility will meet all local planning and zoning
requirements that existed on the date the application was filed;
(f) Whether the additional load imposed upon the electricity transmission system
by use of the merchant electric generating facility will adversely affect the
reliability of service for retail customers of electric utilities regulated by the
Public Service Commission;
(g) Except where the facility is subject to a statewide setback established by a
planning and zoning commission as provided in KRS 278.704(3) and except
for a facility proposed to be located on a site of a former coal processing plant
and the facility will use on-site waste coal as a fuel source, whether the
exhaust stack of the proposed merchant electric generating facility and any
wind turbine is at least one thousand (1,000) feet from the property boundary
Page 5 of 10
XXXX 2/18/2025 2:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1399
of any adjoining property owner and all proposed structures or facilities used
for generation of electricity are two thousand (2,000) feet from any residential
neighborhood, school, hospital, or nursing home facility, unless a different
setback has been requested and approved under KRS 278.704(4). If a
planning and zoning commission has established setback requirements that
differ from those under KRS 278.704(2), the applicant shall provide evidence
of compliance. If the facility is proposed to be located on site of a former coal
processing plant and the facility will use on-site waste coal as a fuel source,
the applicant shall provide evidence of compliance with the setback
requirements provided in KRS 278.704(5);
(h) The efficacy of any proposed measures to mitigate adverse impacts that are
identified pursuant to paragraph (a), (b), (e), or (f) of this subsection from the
construction or operation of the proposed facility;
(i) Whether the applicant has a good environmental compliance history; and
(j) Whether the decommissioning plan is complete and complies with the
requirements of KRS 278.706(2)(m) and any other local requirements that
may apply.
(2) When considering an application for a construction certificate for a merchant
electric generating facility, the board may consider the policy of the General
Assembly to encourage the use of coal as a principal fuel for electricity generation
as set forth in KRS 152.210, provided that any facility, regardless of fuel choice,
shall comply fully with KRS 224.10-280, 278.212, 278.216, and 278.700 to
278.716.
(3) A person that has received a construction certificate for a merchant electric
generating facility shall:
(a) File with the Energy and Environment Cabinet the copy of the bond or other
similar security that, pursuant to KRS 278.706(2)(m)5., is required by a
Page 6 of 10
XXXX 2/18/2025 2:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1399
county or a municipal government or as part of a decommissioning plan, no
later than the date upon which the construction of the merchant generating
facility commences, and refile an updated copy at least once every five (5)
years thereafter;
(b) Not transfer rights and obligation under the certificate without having first
applied for and received a board determination that:
1. The acquirer has a good environmental compliance history; and
2. The acquirer has the financial, technical, and managerial capacity to
meet the obligations imposed by the terms of the approval or has the
ability to contract to meet these obligations;
(c) File with the Energy and Environment Cabinet a notice of the date that
construction is complete and the merchant electric generating facility begins
producing electricity for sale. At the time of the filing of the notice required
by this paragraph, a construction certificate holder for a solar merchant
electric generating facility shall also file a report with the Energy and
Environment Cabinet detailing all federal and state incentives utilized by
the construction certificate holder relating to the siting, construction, and
operation of the facility. The Energy and Environment Cabinet shall
compile a report of all of the state and federal incentive disclosures made by
solar merchant electric generating facilities under this paragraph each year
and submit it annually to the Legislative Research Commission on or before
December 1; and
(d) Following the date the merchant electric generating facility begins producing
electricity for sale, file a notice of any transaction involving the transfer or
sale of ownership, control, or the right to control the merchant electric
generating facility, with lessors of property where the merchant electric
generating facility is located, the Energy and Environment Cabinet, the county
Page 7 of 10
XXXX 2/18/2025 2:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1399
judge/executive of a county and, if applicable, the mayor of a municipality in
which the merchant electric generating facility is located, within ten (10) days
of completing the transaction. The notice shall include the name, street
address, telephone number, and e-mail address of the person acquiring
ownership, control, or the right to control the merchant electric generating
facility.
(4) A person that has acquired ownership, control, or the right to control a merchant
electric generating facility from the applicant or its successor or assign shall file
with the Energy and Environment Cabinet within ten (10) days of completing the
acquisition:
(a) A written consent to assume the obligations set forth in the decommissioning
plan as of the date the acquisition occurred; and
(b) A notice of adoption of an existing bond or other similar security previously
filed pursuant to subsection (3)(a) of this section or a replacement bond or
other similar security that complies with KRS 278.706(2)(m)5. An existing
bond or other similar security shall be adopted, or a replacement bond or other
similar security shall be in place, as of the date the acquisition occurs so that
there is no lapse in coverage of the decommissioning bond or other similar
security. A person making a filing pursuant to this subsection shall file an
updated bond or other similar security that complies with KRS
278.706(2)(m)5. at least once every five (5) years.
(5) Any person who transfers or sells ownership, control, or the right to control a
merchant electric generating facility shall remain liable for all existing
decommissioning obligations and bond requirements until the person who acquires
ownership, control, or the right to control the merchant electric generating facility
files with the Energy and Environment Cabinet the documents required by
subsection (4) of this section and they are accepted as complete by the secretary.
Page 8 of 10
XXXX 2/18/2025 2:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1399
(6) Any application approval condition that requires the approval of the transfer of
control of a merchant electric generating facility after construction is complete shall
be void and unenforceable, but any transfer of control of a merchant electric
generating facility shall be subject to compliance with the requirements of
subsections (3)(d), (4), and (5) of this section.
(7) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, including any order issued by
the board prior to June 29, 2023, after the board has approved an application for a
construction certificate for a merchant electric generating facility under this section,
the approved applicant has posted the bond or similar security required under KRS
278.706(2)(m)5., and the facility is constructed and begins generating electricity for
sale, the board's authority to enforce any conditions of the construction certificate,
including bonding and decommissioning requirements, shall end and the secretary
of the Energy and Environment Cabinet shall monitor and enforce the construction
certificate holder's compliance with the requirements of KRS 278.700 to 278.716
and the conditions of its construction certificate application approval.
(8) In addition to all compliance monitoring and enforcement performed by the
secretary of the Energy and Environment Cabinet, and notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, the secretary shall also review the
decommissioning plan required by KRS 278.706(2)(m) or by local ordinance,
license, or permit and the bond or similar security amount required by KRS
278.706(2)(m)5. or by local ordinance, license, or permit as needed, including any
time a transfer determination is made under subsection (5) of this section, but in any
event at least once every five (5) years. Upon review, the secretary of the Energy
and Environment Cabinet shall require the decommissioning plan to be updated and
the bond amount to be changed to match any significant change in circumstances or
change to the estimated cost of effectuating the decommissioning plan or to the
salvage value of the facility or its components.
Page 9 of 10
XXXX 2/18/2025 2:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1399
(9) After the facility for which an application for a construction certificate has been
approved is constructed and begins generating electricity for sale, the secretary of
the Energy and Environment Cabinet shall ensure ongoing compliance with the
mitigation measures that were conditions of the application approval under KRS
278.708(6) and any enforcement by the board of the mitigation measures shall
cease.
(10) During the period that the merchant electric generating facility is operational, if
solar panels are replaced and discarded, the facility owner-operator shall remove
discarded solar panels from the site within ninety (90) days of completion of the
work. Upon request of the facility owner-operator, the secretary of the Energy and
Environment Cabinet may extend the time period under this subsection for
removing discarded solar panels.
Page 10 of 10
XXXX 2/18/2025 2:19 PM Jacketed